Georgia, session 2025_26, HB396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to reincorporate and provide a new charter for the City of Acworth, approved
February 17, 1989 (Ga. L. 1989, p. 3512), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May
6, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p. 4039), is amended by revising subsection (a) of Section 1.11 as
follows:
"(a) The boundaries of this city shall be those existing on the effective date of this charter
with such alterations as may be made from time to time by local law or in a manner
provided by general state law. The boundaries of this city at all times shall be shown on
a map, a written description, or any combination thereof, to be retained permanently in the
office of the city clerk and to be designated, as the case may be, the 'Official Map or
Description of the Corporate Limits of the City of Acworth, Georgia.' Photographic, typed,
H. B. 396
- 1 -

LC 62 0096/AP
or other copies of such map or description certified by the city clerk shall be admitted as
evidence in all courts and shall have the same force and effect as the original map or
description. The 'Official Map or Description of the Corporate Limits of the City of
Acworth, Georgia,' dated December 19, 2024, prepared by the City Clerk of the City of
Acworth, is adopted as the official map of the corporate limits of the City of Acworth,
Georgia, and the corporate boundaries of the City of Acworth, Georgia, as of January 1,
2025, shall be reflected on said official map, subject to amendment as set forth in this
charter or by local Act or in accordance with the general laws of the state."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 396
- 2 -